Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,104
Person, defined.

Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited liability company, company, agency, association, corporation, state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision. Whenever a fine or imprisonment is prescribed or imposed in the Compressed Fuel Tax Act, the word person as applied to a partnership, a limited liability company, or an association means the partners or members thereof.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 8.